intl/locales/gu/hyphenation/hyph_gu.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
2‍2
1‌1
અ1
આ1
ઇ1
ઈ1
ઉ1
ઊ1
ઋ1
ૠ1
એ1
ઐ1
ઓ1
ઔ1
ા1
િ1
ી1
ુ1
ૂ1
ૃ1
ૄ1
ૢ1
ૣ1
ે1
ૈ1
ો1
ૌ1
1ક
1ખ
1ગ
1ઘ
1ઙ
1ચ
1છ
1જ
1ઝ
1ઞ
1ટ
1ઠ
1ડ
1ઢ
1ણ
1ત
1થ
1દ
1ધ
1ન
1પ
1ફ
1બ
1ભ
1મ
1ય
1ર
1લ
1ળ
1વ
1શ
1ષ
1સ
1હ
2ઁ1
2ઃ1
2ઽ1
2્2
2ં2
